California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Aiding or abetting an unlicensed individual or unregistered company to evade the provisions of this chapter or knowingly combining or conspiring with an unlicensed individual or unregistered company, or allowing one’s license or company registration to be used by an unlicensed individual or unregistered company, or acting as agent or partner or associate, or otherwise, of an unlicensed individual or unregistered company to evade the provisions of this chapter is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 64.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8640.

Payment, or the offer to pay, by any licensee or registered company to any party to a real estate transaction of any commission, bonus, rebate, or other thing of value as compensation or inducement for the referral to such licensee or registered company of pest control work arising out of such transaction is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 65.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8641.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or any rule or regulation adopted by the board, or the furnishing of a report of inspection without the making of a bona fide inspection of the premises for wood-destroying pests or organisms, or furnishing a notice of work completed prior to the completion of the work specified in the contract, is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 282, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8642.

The commission of any grossly negligent or fraudulent act by the licensee as a pest control operator, field representative, or applicator or by a registered company is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8643.

The negligent handling or use of any pesticide is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 32.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8644.

Fraud or misrepresentation, after inspection, by any licensee or registered company engaged in pest control work of any infestation or infection of wood-destroying pests or organisms found in property or structures, or respecting any conditions of the structure that would ordinarily subject structures to attack by wood-destroying pests or organisms, whether or not a report was made pursuant to Sections 8516 and 8517 of this code, is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 67.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8645.

Impersonation of any state, county or city inspector or official is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

8646.

Disregard and violation of pesticide use and application, structural pest control device, fumigation, or extermination laws of the state or of any of its political subdivisions, or regulations adopted pursuant to those laws, is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 651, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8646.5.

A notice of noncompliance shall be issued to a licensee or registered company whenever an authorized representative of the board finds that a pesticide application, fumigation or extermination procedure being performed by the licensee or registered company is not in compliance with applicable laws, rules, or regulations. Upon receiving such notice, the licensee or registered company shall discontinue such pest control work until the procedure is brought into compliance. Failure to discontinue after receiving a notice of noncompliance is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 68.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8647.

Failure to comply in the sale or use of pesticides with the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12751) of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 33.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8648.

Authorizing, directing, conniving at or aiding in the publication, advertisement, distribution or circulation of any material by false statement or representation concerning a registered company’s business is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 69.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8649.

Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a structural pest control operator, field representative, applicator, or registered company is a ground for disciplinary action. The certified record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8650.

Acting in the capacity of a licensee or registered company under any of the licenses or registrations issued hereunder except:

(a) In the name of the licensee or registered company as set forth upon the license or registration, or

(b) At the address and location or place or places of business as licensed or registered or as later changed as provided in this chapter is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 71.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.

The performing or soliciting of structural pest control work, the inspecting for structural or household pests, or the applying of any pesticide for the purpose of eliminating, exterminating, controlling, or preventing structural or household pests in branches of pest control other than those for which the operator, field representative, or applicator is licensed or the company is registered is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 34.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8652.

Failure of a registered company to make and keep all inspection reports, field notes, contracts, documents, notices of work completed, and records, other than financial records, for a period of not less than three years after completion of any work or operation for the control of structural pests or organisms, is a ground for disciplinary action. These records shall be made available to the executive officer of the board or his or her duly authorized representative during business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 10.8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8653.

The failure of any registered company or agent or officer thereof, to pay any moneys due for any materials or services rendered in connection with its operations as a registered pest control company, when it has the ability to pay or when it has received sufficient funds therefor as payment for the particular pest control work, project, or operation for which the services or materials were rendered or purchased, is a ground for disciplinary action, as is the false denial of any such indebtedness or of the validity of the claim thereof with intent to secure for itself, or other person any discount upon such indebtedness or with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud the person to whom such indebtedness is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 74.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8654.

Any individual who has been denied a license for any of the reasons specified in Section 8568, or who has had his or her license revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew his or her license while it was under suspension, or who has been a member, officer, director, associate, qualifying manager, or responsible managing employee of any partnership, corporation, firm, or association whose application for a company registration has been denied for any of the reasons specified in Section 8568, or whose company registration has been revoked as a result of disciplinary action, or whose company registration is under suspension, and while acting as such member, officer, director, associate, qualifying manager, or responsible managing employee had knowledge of or participated in any of the prohibited acts for which the license or registration was denied, suspended or revoked, shall be prohibited from serving as an officer, director, associate, partner, qualifying manager, or responsible managing employee of a registered company, and the employment, election or association of such person by a registered company is a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 75.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8655.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a structural pest control operator, field representative, applicator, or registered company is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article or Section 8568 of this chapter. The board may order the license or registration suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the individual or registered company to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8656.

In addition to the remedies provided for in Section 125.9, when the licensee who is a registered company has failed to pay the fine assessed pursuant to a citation within 30 days of the date of assessment, unless the citation is being appealed, the board shall not sell to the registered company any pesticide use stamps until the assessed fine has been paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 10.85.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8657.

The appointment of a receiver of the property of a licensee or registered company as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 564) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or the making of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

If a license or registration is suspended or revoked upon the grounds set forth in this section, the registrar in his or her discretion may renew or reissue such license upon the condition that each contract undertaken by the licensee or registered company be separately covered by a bond or bonds conditioned upon the performance of, and the payment of labor and material required by, the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 77.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8658.

The board may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter in any superior court in and for the county in which the violation has occurred. Any such action shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the board shall not be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of an adequate remedy at law or irreparable damage or loss. The action shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

8660.

A disciplinary review committee consisting of three members shall be established for the purposes of reviewing appeals of orders issued pursuant to Section 8617. The committee shall be made up of one member representing the Director of Pesticide Regulation and one member representing the board. The third member shall be a licensed pest control operator actively involved in the business of pest control and shall be selected by agreement of the other members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 35.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8662.

(a) Whenever the right of a structural pest control licensee or registered company to make pesticide applications is to be suspended or the licensee, registered company, or unlicensed individual is to be fined pursuant to Section 8617, and if the person upon whom the commissioner imposed a fine or suspension requested and appeared at a hearing before the commissioner in accordance with Section 8617, the party to be suspended or fined may appeal to the Disciplinary Review Committee by filing a written appeal with the committee within 30 days of receipt of the fine or suspension order.

(b) The following procedures shall apply to the appeal:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her or its authorized agent, state the grounds for the appeal, and include a copy of the commissioner’s decision. The appellant shall file a copy of the appeal with the commissioner at the same time it is filed with the committee.

(2) Any party may, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter, or at a later time prescribed by the committee or its designee, present the record of the hearing, including written evidence that was submitted at the hearing and written argument to the committee stating the grounds for affirming, modifying, or reversing the commissioner’s decision.

(3) The committee or its designee may grant oral argument upon application made at the time written arguments are filed. If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given each party at least 10 days before the date set therefor. The times may be altered by mutual agreement of the appellant, the commissioner, and the committee.

(4) At any time written evidence is submitted to the committee, a copy shall be immediately provided to the other party.

(5) The committee shall decide the appeal on the record of the hearing, including the written evidence and the written argument described in paragraph (2) that the committee may have received. If the committee finds substantial evidence in the record to support the commissioner’s decision, the committee shall affirm the decision.

(6) The committee shall render its written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal or within 15 days from the date of oral arguments, or as soon thereafter as practical.

(7) On an appeal pursuant to this section, the committee may sustain, modify by reducing the time of suspension or the amount of the fine levied, or reverse the decision. A copy of the committee’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to each party.

(8) Review of the decision of the committee may be sought by the licensee, registered company, or unlicensed individual pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 443, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8663.

(a) This section only applies to work conducted under a Branch 1 license.

(b) A copy of a notice of violation issued for any violation committed by a subcontractor shall be sent to the prime contractor responsible for the work by the issuing authority within 30 days from the date the violation was committed or discovered. In circumstances where the violation is classified as serious or moderate, notification shall be performed by certified mail with a return receipt requested. 

(c) The board or county agricultural commissioners, when acting pursuant to Section 8616.4, may levy a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) against a registered company acting as a
 prime contractor for any serious or moderate violation committed by any licensee with whom the prime contractor has subcontracted if, before that violation occurred, the prime contractor had been notified by certified mail, return receipt requested, of two or more serious or moderate violations committed by that subcontractor within 12 consecutive months.

Fines collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the Education and Enforcement Account in the Structural Pest Control Education and Enforcement Fund.

(d) For purposes of this section, “serious or moderate” violation includes, but is not limited to, a violation of any of the following provisions of this code or of the California Code of Regulations that poses a serious hazard to humans:

(1) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1970.4 of Title 16 of, or Section 6454 of
 Title 3 of, the California Code of Regulations, or a violation of Section 8505.5.

(2) Any violation of the structural pest control law that results in a serious injury to any person.

(3) A violation of Section 8505.2 or 8505.3, relating to direct and personal supervision.

(4) A violation of Section 8505.7, relating to vacating and securing structures.

(5) A violation of Section 6780 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(6) A violation of Section 6454 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(7) A violation of Section 8505.12, relating to warning agents.

(8) A violation of Section 8505.9 or 8505.10, relating to warning signs.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a prime contractor may be fined for a subcontractor’s first violation for failing to have a signed Occupants Fumigation Notice, pursuant to Section 1970.4 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, on the premises being treated, or for failure to provide advance notice of a fumigation pursuant to Section 8538 to the occupants of the premises being treated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 15.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.

(a) This section only applies to work conducted under a Branch 1 license.

(b) Before a fine can be levied pursuant to Section 8663, the prime contractor shall be provided notice of the nature of the violation and shall be given an opportunity to be heard, including the right to review the commissioner’s evidence and a right to present evidence on his or her own behalf.

(c) The prime contractor may appeal the fine to the Disciplinary Review Committee and shall be subject to the procedures in Section 8662.

(d) If a fine is ordered, it may not take effect until 20 days after the date of the decision provided that no appeal is filed. If an appeal is filed pursuant to Section 8662, the order shall be stayed until 20 days after the committee has ruled on the appeal.

(e) Once final action is taken pursuant to this section, no other administrative or civil action may be taken by any state governmental agency for the same violation. However, action taken pursuant to this section may be used by the board as evidence of prior discipline, and multiple local actions may be the basis for statewide disciplinary action by the board pursuant to Section 8620. A certified copy of the fine order issued pursuant to this section or Section 8662 shall constitute conclusive evidence of the occurrence of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 384, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8665.

The fact that an applicator is licensed shall not affect any liability or responsibility for disciplinary action of any operator, field representative, or registered company that employs or supervises an applicator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8666.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee under this chapter to recommend or to perform any pest control corrective work under any contract or agreement that the licensee knows or has reason to know is in excess of that required to eliminate the condition for which the licensee was employed.

A violation of this section is a public offense and is punishable upon the first conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 106.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Revenue [8670. - 8676.]

8670.

As used in this chapter, “original operator’s license” means an operator’s license that is not a renewal license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8671.

As used in this chapter, “renewal operator’s license” means a license issued to an individual who had an operator’s license unrevoked and unsuspended on June 30th of the preceding renewal period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 79.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8672.

As used in this chapter, “original field representative’s license” means a field representative’s license issued to an individual who did not have a license on the preceding June 30th.

For the purpose of this chapter, a renewal field representative’s license means a field representative’s license issued to an individual who had a field representative’s license on June 30th of the preceding renewal period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 360, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8672.1.

(a) As used in this chapter, “original applicator’s license” means an applicator’s license issued for an individual who did not have a license on the preceding June 30.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, a renewal of an applicator’s license means an applicator’s license issued to an individual who had an applicator’s license on June 30 of the preceding renewal period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 36.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8673.

License fees shall not be prorated unless an individual licensed as an operator, a field representative, or an applicator requests an earlier expiration date of one of the licenses in accordance with Section 8590. All license and registration fees shall be paid in advance of the issuance of the license or registration, and all examination fees shall be paid in advance of the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 37.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8674.

The fees prescribed by this chapter are the following:

(a) A duplicate license fee of not more than two dollars ($2).

(b) A fee for filing a change of name of a licensee of not more than two dollars ($2).

(c) An operator’s examination fee of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(d) An operator’s license fee of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(e) An operator’s license renewal fee of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(f) A company
 registration fee of not more than one hundred twenty dollars ($120).

(g) A branch office registration fee of not more than sixty dollars ($60).

(h) A field representative’s examination fee of not more than seventy-five dollars ($75).

(i) A field representative’s license fee of not more than forty-five dollars ($45).

(j) A field representative’s license renewal fee of not more than forty-five dollars ($45).

(k) An applicator’s examination fee of not more than sixty dollars ($60).

(l) An applicator’s license fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50).

(m) An
 applicator’s license renewal fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50).

(n) An activity form fee, per property address, of not more than five dollars ($5).

(o) A fee for certifying a copy of an activity form of not more than three dollars ($3).

(p) A fee for filing a change of a registered company’s name, principal office address, or branch office address, qualifying manager, or the names of a registered company’s officers, or bond or insurance of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25) for each change.

(q) A fee for approval of continuing education providers of not more than fifty dollars ($50).

(r) A pesticide use report filing fee of not more than five dollars ($5) for each pesticide use
 report or combination of use reports representing a registered structural pest control company’s total county pesticide use for the month.

(s) A fee for approval of continuing education courses of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(t) (1) Any person who pays a fee pursuant to subdivision (r) shall, in addition, pay a fee of two dollars ($2) for each pesticide use stamp or stamp number purchased from the board. Notwithstanding any other law, the fee established pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into the Structural Pest Control Research Fund that is hereby continued in existence and continuously appropriated to be used only for structural pest control research.

(2) A charge for administrative expenses of the board in an amount not to exceed 5 percent of the amount collected
 and deposited in the Structural Pest Control Research Fund may be assessed against the fund. The charge shall be limited to expenses directly related to the administration of the fund.

(3) The board shall, by regulation, establish a five-member research advisory panel, including, but not limited to, representatives from the Structural Pest Control Board, the structural pest control industry, the Department of Pesticide Regulation, and the University of California. The panel, or other entity designated by the board, shall solicit on behalf of the board all requests for proposals and present to the panel all proposals that meet the criteria established by the panel. The panel shall review the proposals and recommend to the board which proposals to accept. The recommendations shall be accepted upon a two-thirds vote of the board. The board shall direct the panel, or other entity designated by the board, to prepare and issue the research contracts
 and authorize the transfer of funds from the Structural Pest Control Research Fund to the applicants whose proposals were accepted by the board.

(4) A charge for requests for proposals, contracts, and monitoring of contracted research shall not exceed 5 percent of the research funds available each year and shall be paid from the Structural Pest Control Research Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 16.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8675.

The delinquent penalty for a renewal of any license issued under this chapter applied for after the expiration date of the license shall be 50 percent of the fee required for the renewal of the license applied for before the expiration date but not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 106.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8676.

The Department of Consumer Affairs shall receive and account for all moneys collected under this chapter at the end of each month, and shall pay it into the Treasury to the credit of the Structural Pest Control Fund, which is hereby continued in existence.

The moneys in this fund shall be expended for the pro rata cost of administration of the Department of Consumer Affairs and for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 14.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Financial Responsibility [8690. - 8695.]

8690.

The board shall not issue any company registration under this chapter unless the applicant shall have filed with the board on a form prescribed by the board evidence of an insurance policy approved by the board as specified in this article, being in effect at the time of the issuance of the company registration. This evidence shall include a provision that the board shall be given a 10-day notice by the insurance company should the policy be canceled or changed during the policy period in a manner as to affect the evidence. Another method of deposit, including a certificate of deposit, or other undertaking shall not satisfy this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   (SB 662)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8691.

A registered company shall not engage in the practices for which it is required to be registered by this chapter unless it maintains an insurance policy as specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 218, Sec. 2.   (SB 662)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8692.

(a) An “insurance policy” as used in this article means a contract of liability insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state or one issued by a nonadmitted carrier whose activities in this state are controlled by the Surplus Line Association, which insures the policyholder against loss from legal liability for damages on property upon which work is being performed or has been completed, including third-party losses, as a result of an accident or occurrence due to participation in control, prevention, or repair activities that require a license under this chapter. The insurance policy shall provide minimum limits of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for any one loss due to bodily injury, sickness, or
 disease, including death at any time resulting therefrom, sustained by any person, and five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) minimum for any one loss due to injury or destruction of property, including the loss of use of the property.

(b) This section shall not be construed to require errors and omissions insurance for all activities relating to or during inspections, inspection reports, recommendations, estimates, and bids, whether oral or written.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 218, Sec. 3.   (SB 662)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8693.

(a) The board shall not issue, reinstate, or continue to maintain any company registration under this chapter unless the applicant or existing company has filed a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance as evidence of current and valid Workers’ Compensation Insurance coverage. A Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance shall be issued and filed, electronically or otherwise, by an insurer duly licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance in this state. If reciprocity conditions exist, as provided in Section 3600.5 of the Labor Code, the registrar shall require the information deemed necessary to ensure compliance with this section.

(b) This section does not apply to a registered company that has no employees
 provided that a statement is filed with the board on a form prescribed by the registrar prior to the issuance, reinstatement, or continued maintenance of a company registration, certifying that the registered company does not employ any person in any manner so as to become subject to the workers’ compensation laws of California or is not otherwise required to provide for workers’ compensation insurance coverage under California law.

(c) (1) The insurer, including the State Compensation Insurance Fund, shall report to the registrar the following information for any policy required under this section: company name, registration number, policy number, dates that coverage is scheduled to commence and lapse, and cancellation date if applicable.

(2) A workers’ compensation insurer shall also report to the registrar a registered company whose workers’ compensation
 insurance policy is canceled by the insurer if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The insurer has completed a premium audit or investigation.

(B) A material misrepresentation has been made by the insured that results in financial harm to the insurer.

(C) No reimbursement has been paid by the insured to the insurer.

(d) (1) Willful or deliberate disregard and violation of workers’ compensation insurance laws constitutes a cause for disciplinary action by the registrar against the registered company and the qualifying manager or managers.

(2) The provisions of Section 8553 shall not apply to any violation of this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   (SB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8695.

The violation of any provision of this article is a misdemeanor and shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation by the board of the operator’s license of the owner or qualifying manager or managers of the registered company and of the company registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 90.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Indemnity Bonds [8697. - 8697.4.]

8697.

Each company registered under the provisions of this chapter shall maintain a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer in the amount of twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500). Another method of deposit, including a certificate of deposit, or other undertaking shall not satisfy this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 218, Sec. 5.   (SB 662)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8697.2.

The bonds required by this article shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who, after entering into a contract with a registered company, is damaged by fraud or dishonesty of the registered company in the performance of the contract, or any person who is damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter by the registered company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 93.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8697.3.

(a) If, after a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, a license or company registration is suspended or revoked upon the grounds set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 8620), the registrar shall require the applicant, licensee, or registered company, as a condition to the issuance, reissuance, or restoration of the license or company registration, to file a surety bond in the sum to be determined by the registrar based upon the seriousness of the violation, but the sum shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) The bond required by this section shall be in addition to the bond required by Section 8697 of this article.

(c) Each applicant, licensee, or registered company required to maintain a bond of the type provided in this section shall post the bond with the registrar for a period of at least two years and during the additional time as there may be unsatisfied claims outstanding against the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 218, Sec. 6.   (SB 662)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8697.4.

Upon failure of a licensee or registered company to maintain in full force and effect any bond required by this article the registrar shall issue an order suspending or revoking the license or company registration, which shall not be reinstated until a new bond is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 95.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14.5. Structural Fumigation Enforcement Program [8698. - 8698.6.]

8698.

The Director of the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall provide oversight for the purposes of carrying out Section 8698.1. The Los Angeles County Agricultural Commissioner, the Orange County Agricultural Commissioner, and the Santa Clara County Agricultural Commissioner may perform increased structural fumigation, inspection, and enforcement activities, to be funded by the eight-dollar ($8) fee collected pursuant to Section 8698.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (AB 2452)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 8698.6.)
-------------------------------------------

8698.1.

(a) Any company that performs a structural fumigation in Los Angeles County, Orange County, or Santa Clara County shall pay to the county agricultural commissioner a fee of eight dollars ($8) for each fumigation conducted at a specific location.

(b) The fees shall be submitted by the 10th day of the month following the month in which the structural fumigation was performed. The fees shall be accompanied by report that lists the addresses of all locations in that county at which a structural fumigation was performed during the prior
 month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 235, Sec. 2.   (AB 2452)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 8698.6.)
-------------------------------------------

8698.2.

The Director of the Department of Pesticide Regulation may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter. In adopting regulations the director shall, in consultation with the Structural Pest Control Board, review recommendations from any individual, including any licensed pest control operator regarding matters which pertain to the use of structural fumigation to control pests. The director shall respond within a reasonable period of time to recommendations which the director deems are practicable and in the interest of the structural pest control industry and the public. The response of the director shall be in writing and shall contain statements regarding reasons for acceptance or rejection of a recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 8698.6.)
-------------------------------------------

8698.3.

(a) The Director of the Department of Pesticide Regulation or a county agricultural commissioner listed in Section 8698 may levy a civil penalty against a person or company violating this chapter, including any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter for failing to comply with Section 8698.1.

(b) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall receive notice of the nature of the violation and shall be given an opportunity to be heard, including the right to review the director’s evidence and a right to present evidence on his or her own behalf.

(c) Review of the decision of the director may be sought by the person against whom the penalty was levied, within 30 days of
 receiving notice of the decision, pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.
